src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/tr-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Türkçe Tam Kısaltmalı Braille
#
#  Copyright (C) 2015 Braille Teknik Ltd. www.brailleteknik.com
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#--------------------------------
# Bu dosya, Braille Teknik Ltd. - Uğur Gürbüz tarafından
# hazırlanmıştır. www.brailleteknik.com
#
# ugur.gurbuz@brailleteknik.com
# Son Değiştirilme Tarihi 23.10.2015

include litdigits6Dots.uti

include braille-patterns.cti

# include tr-chardefs.cti

# Aralık Ayarlamaları
space \s 0		SPACE
space \x00a0 0		NO-BREAK SPACE
space \x2002 78		EN SPACE, modified to show space holders
space \x2003 0		EM SPACE
space \x2004 0		THREE-PER-EM SPACE
space \x2005 0		FOUR-PER-EM SPACE
space \x2006 0		SIX-PER-EM SPACE
space \x2007 0		FIGURE SPACE
space \x2008 0		PUNCTUATION SPACE
space \x2009 0		THIN SPACE
space \x200a 0		HAIR SPACE
space \x202f 0		NARROW NO-BREAK SPACE
space \x205f 0		MEDIUM MATHEMATICAL SPACE

# Noktalamalar
punctuation . 256
punctuation , 2
punctuation : 25
punctuation ; 23
punctuation ! 235
punctuation ? 236
punctuation ' 3
punctuation " 56
punctuation \x0027 3 '
punctuation \x0022 56 "
punctuation ( 2356
punctuation ) 356
punctuation [ 12356
punctuation ] 23456
punctuation { 2467
punctuation } 1357
punctuation < 3-246
punctuation > 3-135
punctuation / 34

# Genel Semboller
sign . 4-256
sign ¦ 123456
sign ¤ 345
sign ¿ 1346
sign ¨ 2456
sign ° 12345
sign · 156
sign ê 26
sign ò 346
sign ï 12456
sign ë 1246
sign ~ 45
sign # 3456
sign \\ 4-34
# sign \\ 4
sign | 6
sign / 34
sign + 56-26
sign % 1456
sign = 56-2356
sign ^ 5
sign @ 4
sign & 12346
sign \x00A3 4 £
sign $ 2346
sign \x20AC 4-15 €
sign \x00A2 345 ¢
sign * 56-236
sign _ 456
sign \x2022 3 • Bullet sign
sign \x00B7 3 · Interpunct
sign - 36 Hyphen, not a dash. Hyphens are spaced as in print text.
sign \x2013 36 – En-dash, not a hyphen.
sign \x2014 36 – Em-dash, not a hyphen.

# Matematik Sembolleri
math \x2212 56-36 − Minus sign, not a hyphen
math \x2030 25-1456 ‰ Per mille sign
math \x221E 123456 ∞ Infinity sign
math \x00B0 3-14 ° Degree symbol
math \x2219 3 ∙ Bullet operator
math \x22C5 2 ⋅ Dot operator
math \x00D7 56-236 × Multiplication sign
math \x00F7 56-25 ÷ Division sign; Obelus
decpoint , 2 Decimal comma
decpoint . 256
decpoint : 25

# Karakter Belirteçleri
numsign 3456
letsign 56
#noletsignafter .
#noletsignafter '
capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6
endcapsword 6-3

emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemphphrase italic 46-46
endemphphrase italic before 46
lenemphphrase italic 4
begemphword italic 46-3
endemphword italic 46-36
emphletter italic 46-25

begemphphrase bold 456-456
#lastwordboldbefore 456
lenemphphrase bold 4
#begcomp 456-346
# endcomp 456-156

# Rakkamlar
digit 0 2457
digit 1 17
digit 2 127
digit 3 147
digit 4 1457
digit 5 157
digit 6 1247
digit 7 12457
digit 8 1257
digit 9 247

# multind 56-6 letsign capsign

# Latin Harfleri

lowercase a 1
lowercase b 12
lowercase c 14
lowercase d 145
lowercase e 15
lowercase f 124
lowercase g 1245
lowercase h 125
lowercase i 24
lowercase j 245
lowercase k 13
lowercase l 123
lowercase m 134
lowercase n 1345
lowercase o 135
lowercase p 1234
lowercase q 4-12345
lowercase r 1235
lowercase s 234
lowercase t 2345
lowercase u 136
lowercase v 1236
lowercase w 4-2456
lowercase x 4-1346
lowercase y 13456
lowercase z 1356
lowercase ç 16
lowercase ğ 126
lowercase ı 35
lowercase ö 246
lowercase ş 146
lowercase ü 1256

base uppercase A a
base uppercase B b
base uppercase C c
base uppercase D d
base uppercase E e
base uppercase F f
base uppercase G g
base uppercase H h
base uppercase İ i
base uppercase J j
base uppercase K k
base uppercase L l
base uppercase M m
base uppercase N n
base uppercase O o
base uppercase P p
base uppercase Q q
#uppercase Q 123457
base uppercase R r
base uppercase S s
base uppercase T t
base uppercase U u
base uppercase V v
base uppercase W w
base uppercase X x
base uppercase Y y
base uppercase Z z
base uppercase Ç ç
base uppercase Ğ ğ
base uppercase I ı
base uppercase Ö ö
base uppercase Ş ş
base uppercase Ü ü

# özel karakter düzeltmeleri
word o 135
word O 135
always ... 256-256-256
begnum $ 2346
midnum - 36
midnum , 2
midnum : 25
midnum / 34
midnum ' 3

endnum a 56-1
endnum b 56-12
endnum c 56-14
endnum d 56-145
endnum e 56-15
endnum f 56-124
endnum g 56-1245
endnum h 56-125
endnum i 56-24
endnum j 56-245
endnum A 6-1
endnum B 6-12
endnum C 6-14
endnum D 6-145
endnum E 6-15
endnum F 6-124
endnum G 6-1245
endnum H 6-125
endnum İ 6-24
endnum J 6-245

repeated .... 256-256-256
repeated ____ 456
repeated ---- 36

multind 56-6 letsign capsletter

# Türkçe Kısaltmalar
# Hece Kısaltmaları
begmidword ba 235
begmidword be 356
begmidword ba' 235-3
begmidword be' 356-3
always bir 2346
begmidword bu 23
begmidword bu' 23-3
word bu 23
always da 1456
always de 2456
always di 12346
begmidword ha 25
begmidword ha' 25-3
begmidword ka 256
begmidword ka' 256-3
endword ki 3456
# word ki 3456
always la 123456
always le 346
always ma 34
always na 1346
always ne 12345
always sa 156
always se 345
always ta 23456
always te 12456
always ve 26
always ya 1246
always ye 12356

# iki harfli kısaltmalar
sufword beden 12-145
sufword bağımsız 12-126
sufword bilgi 12-123
sufword bundan 12-1345
sufword beraber 12-1235
sufword basit 12-234
sufword başka 12-146
sufword bütün 12-2345
sufword böyle 12-13456
sufword bazı 12-1356
sufword cumhuriyet 14-134
sufword cisim 14-234
sufword cevap 14-1236
sufword çocuk 16-14
sufword çoğu 16-126
sufword çalışkan 16-123
sufword çünkü 16-1345
sufword çeşit 16-146
sufword çevre 16-1236
sufword değil 145-126
sufword dolayı 145-123
sufword demek 145-134
sufword deney 145-1345
sufword devlet 145-1236
sufword madde 134-145
sufword millet 134-123
sufword memleket 134-134
sufword ancak 1345-14
sufword niçin 1345-16
sufword anadolu 1345-145
sufword nehir 1345-125
sufword anne 1345-1345
sufword insan 1345-234
sufword arka 1235-13
sufword örneğin 1235-1345
sufword arası 1235-234
sufword orta 1235-2345
sufword sebep 234-12
sufword sıcak 234-14
sufword soğuk 234-126
sufword eski 234-13
sufword osmanlı 234-134
sufword soru 234-1235
sufword savaş 234-1236
sufword aşağı 146-126
sufword şehir 146-125
sufword şekil 146-13
sufword şimdi 146-134
sufword fazla 124-1356
sufword gibi 1245-12
sufword gece 1245-14
sufword genel 1245-1345
sufword güzel 1245-1356
sufword haber 125-12
sufword hiç 125-16
sufword halk 125-123
sufword hemen 125-134
always hangi 125-1345
sufword hepsi 125-1234
sufword hayat 125-13456
sufword hazır 125-1356
sufword kabul 13-12
sufword küçük 13-16
sufword kadın 13-145
sufword kahraman 13-125
sufword kolay 13-123
sufword kendi 13-1345
sufword kısım 13-234
sufword kitap 13-2345
sufword kuvvet 13-1236
sufword kuzey 13-1356
sufword lazım 123-1356
sufword işte 146-2345
sufword şöyle 146-13456
sufword tabiyat 2345-12
sufword toprak 2345-1234
sufword vatan 1236-2345
sufword aydın 13456-145
sufword yukarı 13456-13
sufword yalnız 13456-123
sufword yeni 13456-1345
sufword yarar 13456-1235
sufword yavaş 13456-1236
sufword yüzyıl 13456-1356
sufword özel 1356-123
sufword uzun 1356-1345
sufword üzere 1356-1235

# tek harfli kısaltmalar
word aynı 1
word büyük 12
word can 14
word çok 16
word daha 145
word ekonomi 15
word fakat 124
word göre 1245
word eğer 126
word her 125
word kısa 35
word için 24
word gün 245
word kadar 13
word ilgi 123
word meydan 134
word neden 1345
word öyle 246
word para 1234
word artık 1235
word sonra 234
word şey 146
word taraf 2345
word uygun 136
word dünya 1256
word var 1236
word yok 13456
word zaman 1356
begmidword aynı 1-3
begmidword büyük 12-3
begmidword can 14-3
begmidword çok 16-3
begmidword daha 145-3
begmidword ekonomi 15-3
begmidword fakat 124-3
begmidword göre 1245-3
begmidword eğer 126-3
begmidword her 125-3
begmidword kısa 35-3
begmidword için 24-3
begmidword gün 245-3
begmidword kadar 13-3
begmidword ilgi 123-3
begmidword meydan 134-3
begmidword neden 1345-3
begmidword öyle 246-3
begmidword para 1234-3
begmidword artık 1235-3
begmidword sonra 234-3
begmidword şey 146-3
begmidword taraf 2345-3
begmidword uygun 136-3
begmidword dünya 1256-3
begmidword var 1236-3
begmidword yok 13456-3
begmidword zaman 1356-3

# Kelime Kökü fiil Kısaltmaları
always  bil 5-12
sufword incele 5-14
sufword çalış 5-16
always dur 5-145
sufword eğit 5-15
sufword faydalan 5-124
always gel 5-1245
sufword öğren 5-126
sufword harca 5-125
always kır 5-35
sufword iste 5-24
sufword kullan 5-13
sufword alış 5-123
sufword tamamla 5-134
sufword anla 5-1345
always sor 5-135
sufword gör 5-246
sufword topla 5-1234
sufword bırak 5-1235
sufword söyle 5-234
sufword başla 5-146
always tut 5-2345
sufword uğra 5-136
sufword yürü 5-1256
always vur 5-1236
sufword yetiş 5-13456
sufword gözle 5-1356
begmidword bekle 5-356
sufword yüksel 5-1456
sufword koy 5-3456
sufword öğret 5-346
always oku 5-1346
sufword yerleş 5-156
sufword getir 5-23456
sufword yaşa 5-1246
sufword bulun 5-235
always koş 5-2346
always geç 5-2456
begmidword kalk 5-256-3
sufword konuş 5-123456
sufword oyna 5-3456
sufword göster 5-12345
always yara 5-345
sufword götür 5-12456
sufword büyü 5-12356
